Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2,123
Judge; personal staff; appointment; salary.

Each judge of a separate juvenile court shall appoint his or her own court reporter, bailiff, and other necessary personal staff. Each court reporter shall be well-skilled in the art of stenography and capable of reporting verbatim the oral proceedings had in court. The salaries of the bailiff and other necessary personal staff of the separate juvenile court shall be fixed by the presiding judge, subject to the approval of the board of county commissioners or supervisors, and shall be paid out of the general fund of the county.

Laws 1959, c. 189, § 9, p. 685;

Laws 1973, LB 446, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1978), § 43-236;

Laws 1981, LB 346, § 80;

Laws 1984, LB 13, § 79.

Where the parents of a minor child are unfit to have its custody, custody may be properly placed in chief juvenile probation officer. Houghton v. Houghton, 179 Neb. 275, 137 N.W.2d 861 (1965); Hall v. Hall, 178 Neb. 91, 132 N.W.2d 217 (1964).

Separate juvenile court may place child in custody of probation officer where both parents are unfit to have custody. Beck v. Beck, 175 Neb. 108, 120 N.W.2d 585 (1963).